Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 4. Administration

§ 254.
Authority of the Secretary.

The Secretary shall conduct any referenda held under this chapter and shall be the final arbiter of referenda results. He or she shall be responsible for the administration of any marketing rules, provided that funding is available.

The Secretary, with the prior approval of the Board or commission at the time of the first filing under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, may make and adopt such rules as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions and intent of this chapter and to enforce the provision of any marketing rule, all of which shall have the effect of law. No other approval of the Board or commission shall be necessary with respect to the adoption of rules. Rulemaking shall be commenced only after approval in a referendum by the affected producers.

The Secretary shall prepare a budget, subject to the approval of the applicable board or commission, for the administration and operating costs and expenses, including advertising and sales promotion or other programs and research when required in any marketing rule, and to provide for the collection of necessary fees to defray costs and expenses. The budget shall provide that the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets be reimbursed for its actual costs of administering the program, but the reimbursement shall not exceed five percent of the total funds collected under the marketing rule.

The Secretary may institute an action as may appear necessary to enforce compliance with any provision of this chapter. The application may be made to the Superior Court in the county in which the producer resides or has his or her place of business.

The Secretary may bring a civil action against any producer who is delinquent in making payments required by a marketing rule. In connection with the civil action, the Secretary may seek and enforce a writ of attachment against property of the delinquent producer.

All information required by a marketing order shall be provided in an accurate and timely manner. Any person who knowingly provides false or incomplete information to the Apple Marketing Board or to a commodity marketing board shall be subject to the provisions of

13 V.S.A. § 3016

, regardless of whether there was an intent to defraud.

The Secretary may inspect the records of any person who produces a commodity that is the subject of a marketing rule in order to determine whether that person is subject to the marketing rule. He or she may also audit the financial records of producers subject to a marketing rule. The Secretary shall have the authority to issue subpoenas to producers, handlers, processors, and distributors to gain information necessary to carry out the purposes of a marketing order.

All production data and financial information relating to an individual producer shall be kept confidential by the Secretary and the Apple Marketing Board, or commodity marketing board, except for use in a collection action and for other law enforcement purposes. Compilations of data relative to groups of individuals may be made public.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1993, No. 73

, § 1, eff. June 10, 1993;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 255.
Eligibility of producers; conduct of referendum.

Only persons who verify pursuant to this section that they are producers shall be eligible to vote in a referendum. The Secretary shall prepare a list of all persons believed to be producers. At least 28 days prior to the referendum, he or she shall mail to each person on the list a notice of the referendum, and a statement on which each person may verify that he or she is a producer within the meaning of this chapter. The Secretary shall also cause to be published the notice and verification statement in two newspapers of general circulation throughout the State on the same day for two successive weeks, the last date of publication to be at least 28 days prior to the date of the referendum. The notice shall also state that no producer shall be eligible to vote unless he or she returns the verification statement to the Secretary postmarked at least 10 days prior to the date of the referendum. A referendum shall not be considered invalid because a producer is unknown to the Secretary or does not receive notification.

Upon receipt of signed verifications, the Secretary shall forthwith mail ballots to all producers who have verified their eligibility to vote. Those producers shall mark their ballots and return them to the Secretary either by hand no later than 10 days after the referendum date or by mail postmarked no later than 10 days after the referendum date.

The Secretary shall count the ballots and release the results to the public.

The results of any referendum shall bind all producers regardless of whether they voted, or were eligible to vote, in the referendum. The results shall also bind persons who become producers thereafter.

Prior to the issuance, amendment, or termination of any marketing rule, the Secretary may require the applicant to deposit with the Agency an amount determined by the Secretary to defray the expense of conducting the referendum. The funds shall be managed as provided by section 256 of this title. If the proposed market rule action is approved in a referendum, the Secretary shall return any unexpended monies collected to the applicant.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 41

, § 3, eff. May 11, 1985; amended

1993, No. 73

, § 1, eff. June 10, 1993;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 256.
Marketing Rule Fund.

A special administrative fund, to be known as the Marketing Rule Fund, is created for the purpose of holding monies collected by the Secretary under this chapter. The fund shall be organized and managed in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5 (special funds). Notwithstanding

32 V.S.A. § 588(3)

, interest earned by the Fund shall be credited to and retained by the Fund and annually carried forward as part of the Fund balance.

Any monies remaining in the Fund at the close of a marketing season may, at the discretion of the applicable board, be refunded on a pro rata basis to all producers from whom the money was collected.

Upon the termination of any marketing rule, the Secretary shall refund on a pro rata basis to all applicable producers any monies remaining and not required to defray the cost of operating the marketing rule, except when the cost of administering the refund would exceed the monies available.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 73

, § 1, eff. June 10, 1993; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.